Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-304
Injuries to roads, bridges, gates, milestones; penalty.

Any person who willfully and maliciously injures any lawful public road in this state or any bridge, gate, milestone, or other fixture on any such road shall, for every such offense, be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and be liable to any party injured in double damages.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 103, p. 744;

R.S.1913, § 3041;

C.S.1922, § 2792;

C.S.1929, § 39-1027;

R.S.1943, § 39-715;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-715;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 28.

Destruction of private, public, or toll bridge, penalty, see section 39-806.